North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-14.1 Surface Mining and Reclamation Operations
38-14.1-21.
Permit approval or denial standards.

Upon the basis of a complete mining application and reclamation plan or a revision thereof as required by this chapter and pursuant to regulations established under this chapter, the commission shall grant, require modification of, or deny the application for a permit and notify the applicant in writing within a reasonable time as established by regulation if no informal conference is held and if an informal conference is held, within thirty days of such conference. The applicant for a permit, or a revision of a permit, has the burden of establishing that the application is in compliance with all the requirements of this chapter. Within ten days after the granting of a permit, the commission shall notify the appropriate local governmental officials in the county in which the area of land to be affected is located that a permit has been issued and shall describe the location of the land.

The commission’s approval or modification of the permit or permit revision application must include consideration of the advice and technical assistance of the state historical society, the department of environmental quality, the soil conservation committee, the game and fish department, the state forester, the state geologist, and the department of water resources, and may include those state agencies versed in soils, agronomy, ecology, geology, and hydrology, and other agencies and individuals experienced in reclaiming surface mined lands.

No permit or revision application may be approved unless the applicant affirmatively demonstrates and the commission finds in writing on the basis of the information set forth in the application or from information otherwise available which will be documented in the approval and made available to the applicant, that all the following requirements are met:

The permit application is accurate and complete and all the requirements of this chapter and of regulations promulgated by the commission have been complied with.

The permit applicant has demonstrated that reclamation as required by this chapter and by regulations promulgated by the commission can be accomplished under the reclamation plan contained in the permit application.

The assessment of the probable cumulative impact of all anticipated mining in the area on the hydrologic balance specified in subdivision o of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-14 has been made by the commission and the proposed operation thereof has been designed to prevent material damage to the hydrologic balance outside the permit area.

The area proposed to be mined is not included within an area designated unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations pursuant to section 38-14.1-05 or is not within an area under study for such designation in an administrative proceeding, provided the petition to have an area so designated has been filed prior to or within the time period specified in subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-18, or unless in such an area as to which an administrative proceeding has commenced, the permit applicant demonstrates that prior to January 4, 1977, the permit applicant has made substantial legal and financial commitments in relation to the operation for which the applicant is applying for a permit.

The proposed surface coal mining operation, if located west of the one hundredth meridian west longitude, would:

Not interrupt, discontinue, or preclude farming on alluvial valley floors that are irrigated or naturally subirrigated, but, excluding undeveloped rangelands which are not significant to farming on said alluvial valley floors and those lands as to which the commission finds that if the farming that will be interrupted, discontinued, or precluded is of such small acreage [hectarage] as to be of negligible impact on the farm’s agricultural production; or

Not materially damage the quantity or quality of water in surface or underground water systems that supply these alluvial valley floors. This subdivision does not affect those surface coal mining operations which on July 1, 1979, produce coal or commercial leonardite in commercial quantities and are located within or adjacent to alluvial valley floors or have obtained specific permit approval by the commission to conduct surface coal mining operations within said alluvial valley floors.

When the mineral estate has been severed from the surface estate, the applicant has complied with the requirements of chapter 38-18.

The commission may delete certain areas from a permit or revision application, reject the application, require the permit applicant to amend the application or any part of such application, including any mining plan, or require any combination of the foregoing, if:

The commission finds that the overburden on any part of the area of land described in the application for a permit is such that experience in the state of North Dakota with a similar type of operation upon land with similar overburden shows that substantial deposition of sediment in streambeds, landslides, water pollution, or permanent destruction of land for agricultural purposes without approved rehabilitation for other uses cannot feasibly be prevented.

The commission finds that the proposed surface coal mining operation will constitute a hazard to a dwelling house, public building, school, church, cemetery, commercial or institutional building, public road, stream, lake, or other public or private property other than property subject to a coal or commercial leonardite lease.

When information available to the commission indicates that any surface coal mining operation owned or controlled by the permit applicant is currently in violation of this chapter, the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 [Pub. L. 95-87; 91 Stat. 445; 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.], or any law or rule of the United States or the state of North Dakota, or of any department or agency of the United States or the state of North Dakota, pertaining to air or water environmental protection, the permit may not be issued until the permit applicant submits proof that such violation has been corrected or is in the process of being corrected to the satisfaction of the regulatory authority with jurisdiction over the violation.

In addition to finding the application in compliance with other requirements of this section, if the area proposed to be mined contains prime farmland pursuant to paragraph 3 of subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-14, the commission shall, pursuant to regulations issued by the commission, grant a permit to mine on prime farmland if the commission finds in writing that the permit applicant has the technological capability to restore such mined area, within a reasonable time, to a level of productivity equal to or greater than nonmined prime farmland in the surrounding area under equivalent levels of management and can meet the soil reconstruction standards in subsection 6 of section 38-14.1-24. Nothing in this chapter pertaining to prime farmland applies to any permit issued prior to July 1, 1979, or to any revisions or renewals thereof, or to any existing surface coal mining operations for which a permit was issued prior to July 1, 1979.

Whenever the commission finds that ongoing surface mining operations are causing or are likely to cause any of the conditions set forth in this subsection, it may make such changes in the permit as it may deem necessary to avoid such described conditions.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1985, ch. 407, § 2; 1985, ch. 409, § 4; 1993, ch. 370, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 503, § 6; 2015, ch. 257, §§ 12, 13; 2017, ch. 199, § 38, effective April 29, 2019; 2021, ch. 488, § 17, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by sections 12 and 13 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 38-14.1-21 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Chapter 257, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2377; and Section 12 of Chapter 257, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2377.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under
S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75.
[Contingency met in 2019]

38-14.1-22.
Permit renewal.

Any valid permit issued pursuant to this chapter shall carry with it the right of successive renewal upon expiration with respect to areas within the boundaries of the existing permit. The holders of the permit may apply for renewal and such renewal must be issued within a reasonable time as set forth in regulations promulgated by the commission subsequent to fulfillment of the public notice requirements of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-18 unless it is established that and written findings are made by the commission that:

The terms and conditions of the existing permit are not being satisfactorily met; and

The present surface coal mining and reclamation operation is not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter; or

The renewal requested substantially jeopardizes the operator’s continuing responsibility on existing permit areas; and

The permittee has not provided evidence that the performance bond in effect for said operation will continue in full force and effect for any renewal requested in such application as well as any additional bond the commission might require pursuant to section 38-14.1-16; or

Any additional revised or updated information required by the commission has not been provided.

On application for renewal, the burden is on the opponents of renewal.

Any permit renewal must be for a term not to exceed the period of the original permit established by this chapter. Application for permit renewal must be made at least one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration of the valid permit.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 2021, ch. 276, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

38-14.1-23.
Permit revision.

During the term of the permit the permittee may submit an application for a revision of the permit, together with a revised reclamation plan, to the commission.

An application for a revision of a permit may not be approved unless the commission finds that reclamation as required by this chapter can be accomplished under the revised reclamation plan. The revision must be approved or disapproved within a reasonable time as established by commission regulation. The commission shall establish guidelines for a determination of the scale or extent of a revision request for which all permit application information requirements and procedures, including notice and hearing, shall apply. Any revisions which propose significant alterations in the reclamation plan are, at a minimum, subject to the notice and hearing requirements of sections 38-14.1-18, 38-14.1-19, and 38-14.1-20.

Any extensions to the area covered by the permit except incidental boundary revisions must be made by application for another permit.

No transfer, assignment, or sale of the rights granted under any permit issued pursuant to this chapter may be made without the written approval of the commission. The commission shall deny approval to the successor in interest of the permittee if the successor in interest is unable to obtain the bond coverage of the original permittee or its equivalent. If the successor in interest is able to obtain the bond coverage of the original permittee, or its equivalent, the successor in interest may arrange for the continuation of surface mining and reclamation operations according to the approved surface mining and reclamation plan of the original permittee pending commission approval of the transfer, assignment, or sale of the rights granted under said permit and any necessary revision or modification of said permit, provided the successor in interest furnishes the necessary information to the commission within thirty days of succeeding to such interest so that the permit in issue can be properly revised or modified.

The commission shall, within a time limit prescribed by commission regulation, review outstanding permits and may require reasonable revision or modification of the permit provisions during the term of such permit. Any such revision or modification must be based upon a written finding and subject to notice and hearing requirements in accordance with sections 38-14.1-18, 38-14.1-19, and 38-14.1-20.

A permittee may withdraw any land described in either the permit application required in section 38-14.1-14 or the extended mining plan required in section 38-14.1-15, except land on which surface coal mining operations have commenced, by notifying the commission thereof. If land covered by the permit term is so withdrawn, the amount of the bond or security filed by the permittee pursuant to the provisions of this chapter must be reduced proportionately.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-24.
Environmental protection performance standards.

General performance standards are applicable to all surface coal mining and reclamation operations and must require the permittee at a minimum to:

Conduct surface coal mining operations so as to maximize the utilization and conservation of the coal or commercial leonardite being recovered so that re-affecting the land in the future through surface coal mining can be minimized.

Restore the land affected to a condition capable of supporting the uses which it was capable of supporting prior to any mining, or higher or better uses approved by the commission, which may include industrial, commercial, agricultural, residential, recreational, or public facilities. In approving the postmining land use, or changes thereto, the commission shall establish by regulation postmining land use criteria that must be demonstrated by the permittee and considered by the commission in making its decision.

Backfill, compact (where advisable to ensure stability or to prevent leaching of toxic materials), and grade to reshape all areas affected by surface coal mining operations to the gentlest topography consistent with adjacent unmined landscape elements in order to develop a postmining landscape that will provide for maximum moisture retention, drainage that will complement the surrounding terrain, maximum stability, minimum soil losses from runoff and erosion, with all highwalls, spoil piles, and depressions eliminated (unless small depressions are needed in order to retain moisture to assist revegetation or as otherwise authorized pursuant to this chapter), and with maximum postmining graded slopes that do not exceed the approximate original contour; provided, however, that:

A different contour or topography may be required by the commission to better achieve the approved postmining land use.

The permittee, at a minimum, shall backfill, grade, and compact (where advisable) using all available overburden and other spoil and waste materials to attain the lowest practicable grade (not to exceed the angle of repose), to provide adequate drainage, and to contain all toxic materials in order to achieve an ecologically sound land use compatible with the surrounding region, in those instances where:

Surface coal mining operations are carried out over a substantial period of time at the same location where the operation transects the coal or commercial leonardite deposit;

The thickness of the coal or commercial leonardite deposits relative to the volume of overburden is large; and

The permittee demonstrates that the overburden and other spoil and waste materials at a particular point in the permit area or otherwise available from the entire permit area are insufficient, giving due consideration to volumetric expansion, to restore the approximate original contour.

Stabilize and protect all surface areas, including spoil piles affected by the surface coal mining and reclamation operation, to effectively control erosion and attendant air and water pollution.

Remove, segregate, and respread suitable plant growth material as required by the commission within the permit area. The commission may require the permittee to segregate suitable plant growth material in two or more soil layers. The commission shall determine the soil layer or layers to be removed based upon the quality and quantity of suitable plant growth material inventoried by the soil survey required in subdivision t of subsection 1 of section 38-14.1-14. Based on the soil survey, the commission shall also determine whether other suitable strata are necessary to meet revegetation requirements. If other strata can be shown to be suitable and necessary to meet revegetation requirements, the commission may require the permittee to determine the areal extent of other suitable strata within the proposed permit area, and to remove, segregate, protect, and respread such material. If the suitable plant growth material or other suitable strata cannot be replaced on an approved graded area within a time short enough to avoid deterioration of such material, the permittee shall stockpile and stabilize such materials by establishing a successful cover of quick-growing plants or by other means thereafter so that the suitable plant growth material or other suitable strata will be protected from wind and water erosion and will remain free from any contamination by toxic material. In the interest of achieving the maximum reclamation provided for in this chapter, the permittee may, or at the discretion of the commission shall, utilize such soil amendments as described in section 38-14.1-02.

For all prime farmlands as identified in paragraph 3 of subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 38-14.1-14 to be mined and reclaimed, the permittee shall, at a minimum, be required to:

Segregate the A horizon of the natural soil or a combination of the A horizon materials and other available suitable plant growth materials that will create a final soil having a productive capacity equal to or greater than that which existed prior to mining; and if not utilized immediately, stockpile this material and provide needed protection from wind and water erosion or contamination;

Segregate the B horizon of the natural soil, or underlying C horizons or other strata, or a combination of such horizons or other strata that are shown to be physically and chemically suitable for plant growth and that can be shown to be equally or more favorable for plant growth than the B horizon, in sufficient quantities to create in the regraded final soil a root zone of comparable depth and quality to that which existed in the natural soil. If not utilized immediately, such material must be stockpiled and provided needed protection from wind and water erosion or contamination;

Replace the material described in subdivision b with proper compaction and uniform depth as determined by the commission over the regraded spoil material; and

Redistribute in a uniform manner as determined by the commission the surface soil described in subdivision a.

Create, if authorized in the approved mining and reclamation plan and permit, as part of reclamation activities, permanent water impoundments in accordance with the requirements of the department of water resources and all of the following standards:

The size of the impoundment will be adequate for its intended purposes.

The impoundment dam construction will be designed to achieve necessary stability with an adequate margin of safety compatible with the requirements of applicable state law.

The quality of impounded water will be suitable on a permanent basis for its intended use, and discharges from the impoundment will not exceed the quality limitations imposed by the North Dakota pollutant discharge elimination system or degrade the water quality below water quality standards established pursuant to this chapter, whichever is more stringent.

The level of water will be reasonably stable.

Final grading will provide adequate safety and access for maintenance and proposed water users.

The water impoundments will not result in the diminution of the quality or quantity of water utilized by adjacent or surrounding landowners for agricultural, industrial, recreational, or domestic uses.

Minimize the disturbances to the prevailing hydrologic balance at the minesite and in associated offsite areas and to the quality and quantity of water in surface and ground water systems both during and after surface coal mining operations and during reclamation by:

Avoiding toxic mine drainage by such measures as, but not limited to:

Preventing water from coming in contact with, or removing water from, toxic producing deposits.

Treating drainage to reduce toxic content which adversely affects downstream water upon being released to watercourses.

Casing, sealing, or otherwise managing boreholes and wells to keep toxic drainage from entering ground and surface waters.

Conducting surface coal mining operations so as to prevent, to the extent possible using the best technology currently available, additional contribution of suspended solids to streamflow, or runoff outside the permit area, but in no event may contributions be in excess of requirements set by applicable state law.

Constructing any siltation structures pursuant to subdivision b prior to commencement of surface coal mining operations, such structures to be certified by a registered professional engineer to be constructed as designed and as approved in the reclamation plan.

Cleaning out and removing temporary settling ponds or other siltation structures from drainways after disturbed areas are revegetated and stabilized and depositing the silt and debris at a site and in a manner approved by the commission.

Restoring recharge capacity of the mined area to approximate premining conditions to the extent possible using the best technology currently available.

Avoiding natural channel deepening or enlargement in operations requiring the discharge of water from mines.

Preserving throughout the surface coal mining and reclamation process the essential hydrologic functions of alluvial valley floors.

Such other actions as the commission may prescribe.

Make such repairs, alterations, or construction as necessary to ensure the delivery of that quality and quantity of water available prior to mining to a surface owner whose supply of water for domestic, agricultural, industrial, or other legitimate use has been disrupted or diminished in quality or quantity by the surface coal mining operation. Such repairs, alterations, or construction must be considered to be part of reclamation and must be made at no cost to the surface owner. Nothing in this chapter may be construed as affecting in any way the right of any person to enforce or protect, under applicable law, the person’s interest in water resources affected by a surface coal mining operation.

Remove or bury all debris and other similar material resulting from the operation and bury all mine wastes, coal, and commercial leonardite processing wastes unless the commission approves the surface disposal of such wastes. If the commission approves the surface disposal of such wastes, the permittee shall stabilize all waste piles in designated areas through construction in compacted layers, including the use of incombustible and impervious materials if necessary, to assure that the final contour of the waste pile will be compatible with natural surroundings and that the site can and will be stabilized and revegetated according to the provisions of this chapter.

Refrain from surface coal mining within five hundred feet [152.4 meters] of underground mines in order to prevent breakthroughs; provided, that the commission shall allow a permittee to mine near, through, or partially through an underground mine if such operations will result in improved resource recovery, abatement of water pollution, or elimination of hazards to the health and safety of the public.

Ensure that all debris, toxic materials, or materials constituting a fire hazard are treated or buried and compacted or otherwise disposed of in a manner designed to prevent contamination of ground or surface waters and that contingency plans are developed to prevent sustained combustion. If a fire hazard exists, the commission has the authority to require the permittee to take such actions as are necessary to abate the hazard, both inside and outside the permit area.

Ensure that explosives are used only in accordance with existing state law and the regulations promulgated by the commission, which must include provisions to:

Provide adequate advance written notice to local governments and residents who might be affected by the use of such explosives by the publication of the planned blasting schedule in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality, by mailing a copy of the proposed blasting schedule to every resident living within one-half mile [804.67 meters] of the proposed blasting site, and by providing daily notice to residents in such areas prior to any blasting.

Maintain for a period of at least three years and make available for public inspection upon request a log detailing the location of the blasts, the pattern and depth of the drill holes, the amount of explosives used per hole, and the order and length of delay in the blasts.

Limit the type of explosives and detonating equipment, the size, the timing, and the frequency of blasts based upon the physical conditions of the site so as to prevent:

Injury to persons.

Damage to public and private property outside the permit area.

Change in the course, channel, or availability of ground or surface water outside the permit area.

Require that all blasting operations be conducted by trained and competent persons as certified by the commission.

Provide that upon the request of a resident or owner of a manmade dwelling or structure within one mile [1.61 kilometers] of any portion of the permitted area the permittee shall conduct a preblasting survey of such structures and submit the survey to the commission and a copy to the resident or owner making the request. The area of the survey must be decided by the commission and must include such provisions as the commission may promulgate.

Ensure that all reclamation efforts proceed in an environmentally sound manner and as contemporaneously as practicable with the surface coal mining operations, provided that all reclamation through the initial planting on any land within the permit area must be completed by the operator no later than three years from completion of surface coal mining operations on such lands, unless otherwise prescribed by the commission.

Ensure that the construction, maintenance, and postmining conditions of haul roads and access roads into and across the site of operations will control or prevent erosion and siltation, pollution of water, damage to fish or wildlife or their habitat, or public or private property.

Refrain from the construction of haul roads and access roads up a streambed or drainage channel or in such proximity to such channel so as to seriously alter the normal flow of water.

Restore lands affected by the surface coal mining operation which have been designated for postmining agricultural purposes to the level of productivity equal to or greater, under equivalent management practices, than nonmined agricultural lands of similar soil types in the surrounding area. For those lands which are to be rehabilitated to native grasslands, a diverse, effective, and permanent vegetative cover must be established of the same seasonal variety native to the area to be affected and capable of self-regeneration, plant succession, and at least equal in extent of cover and productivity to the natural vegetation of the area. The level of productivity and cover attained on disturbed lands within the permit area must be demonstrated by the permittee using comparisons with similar lands in the surrounding area having equivalent historical management practices and that are undisturbed by mining, or comparable disruptive activities.

Assume the responsibility for successful revegetation, as required by subsection 17, for a period of ten full years after the last year of augmented seeding, fertilizing, irrigation, or other work, provided that, when the commission approves a long-term intensive agricultural postmining land use, the ten-year period of responsibility for revegetation commences at the date of initial planting. However, for previously mined areas that are affected by remining, the operator’s responsibility for successful revegetation will extend for a period of five full years after the last year of augmented seeding, fertilizing, irrigation, and other work in order to assure compliance with the applicable standards. For the purposes of this subsection, “previously mined areas” are lands that were affected by coal or commercial leonardite mining activities prior to January 1, 1970, and “augmented seeding, fertilizing, irrigation, or other work” does not include normal conservation practices recognized locally as good management for the postmining land use.

Place all spoil material from the initial pit or other excess spoil material resulting from surface coal mining and reclamation activities in such a manner that all of the following requirements are met:

Spoil is transported and placed in a controlled manner in position for concurrent compaction and in such a way so as to assure mass stability and to prevent mass movement.

The areas of disposal are within the bonded permit areas.

Appropriate surface and internal drainage systems and diversion ditches are used so as to minimize spoil erosion and movement.

The disposal area does not contain springs, natural watercourses, or wet weather seeps unless lateral drains are constructed from the wet areas to the main underdrains in such a manner that filtration of the water into the spoil pile will be prevented.

If placed on a slope, the spoil is placed upon the most moderate slope among those upon which, in the judgment of the commission, the spoil could be placed in compliance with all the requirements of this chapter.

The final configuration is compatible with the natural drainage pattern and surroundings and suitable for intended uses.

Design of the spoil disposal area is certified by a registered professional engineer in conformance with professional standards.

All other provisions of this chapter are met.

Meet such other criteria as are necessary to achieve reclamation in accordance with the purposes of this chapter, taking into consideration the physical, climatological, and other characteristics of the site.

To the extent possible using the best technology currently available, minimize disturbances and adverse impacts of the surface coal mining operation on fish, wildlife, and related environmental values, and achieve enhancement of such resources where practicable.

1.1.

Conduct any auger mining associated with surface coal mining operations in a manner that will maximize recoverability of coal or commercial leonardite and other mineral reserves remaining after mining activities and reclamation operations are completed, and seal or fill all auger holes as necessary to ensure long-term stability of the area and minimize any adverse impact to the environment or hazard to public health or safety. The commission may prohibit auger mining if necessary to maximize the utilization, recoverability, or conservation of coal or commercial leonardite resources, to ensure long-term stability, or to protect against any adverse impact to the environment or hazard to public health or safety.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 1981, ch. 374, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 410, § 2; 1991, ch. 392, § 2; 1993, ch. 371, § 1; 2009, ch. 316, § 1; 2015, ch. 257, § 14, 15, 16, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 488, § 18, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by sections 14–16 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 38-14.1-24 was amended 3 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1 , the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 15 of Chapter 257, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2377; Section 14 of Chapter 257, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2377; and Section 16 of Chapter 257, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2377.

38-14.1-25.
Prohibited mining practices.

A permittee may not use any coal or commercial leonardite mine waste piles consisting of mine wastes, tailings, coal processing wastes, or other liquid or solid wastes either temporarily or permanently as dams or embankments unless approved by the commission after consultation with the department of water resources.

A permittee may not locate any part of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations or deposit overburden, debris, or waste materials outside the permit area for which bond has been posted, except as provided in subsection 24 of section 38-14.1-03.

A permittee may not deposit overburden, debris, or waste materials in such a way that normal erosion or slides brought about by natural causes will permit the same to go beyond or outside the permit area for which bond has been posted.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 2015, ch. 257, § 17, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 488, § 19, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 17 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

38-14.1-26.
Interference with commission employees.

No operator or permittee may, except as provided by law, willfully resist, prevent, impede, or interfere with the commission or any of its agents in the performance of duties under this chapter. Whoever knowingly violates this section is, upon conviction, subject to the penalty provided in subsection 4 of section 38-14.1-32.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1.

38-14.1-27.
Inspections and monitoring.

For the purpose of developing or assisting in the development, administration, and enforcement of this chapter and of regulations promulgated by the commission in accordance with this chapter or in the administration and enforcement of any permit under this chapter, or of determining whether any operator or permittee is in violation of any requirement of this chapter or the regulations promulgated by the commission in accordance with this chapter:

The commission shall require any permittee to:

Establish and maintain appropriate records.

Submit monthly, semiannual, annual, and other reports, including information as the commission may require.

Install, use, and maintain any necessary monitoring equipment or methods.

Evaluate results in accordance with such methods, at such locations, intervals, or in such manner as the commission shall prescribe.

Provide such other information relative to surface coal mining and reclamation operations as the commission deems reasonable and necessary.

For those surface coal mining and reclamation operations which remove or disturb strata that serve as aquifers which significantly ensure the hydrologic balance of water use either on or off the mining site, the commission, in consultation with other appropriate state agencies, shall specify those:

Monitoring sites to record the quantity and quality of surface drainage above and below the minesite as well as in the potential zone of influence.

Monitoring sites to record level, amount, and samples of ground water and aquifers potentially affected by the mining and also directly below the lowermost (deepest) coal or commercial leonardite seam to be mined.

Records of well logs and borehole data to be maintained.

Monitoring sites to record precipitation.

An annual map must be submitted by the operator to the commission for each year of the permit term and until the total bond amount has been released. The map must be in a form prescribed by the commission showing the status of surface coal mining and reclamation operations that have occurred during the year being reported, with a legend showing the number of acres [hectares] affected by such operations.

The authorized representatives of the commission, without advance notice, without a warrant, and upon presentation of appropriate credentials:

Shall have the right of entry to, upon, or through any surface coal mining and reclamation operations or any premises in which any records required to be maintained under this subsection are located; and

May at reasonable times, and without delay, have access to and copy any records, inspect any monitoring equipment or method of operation required under this chapter.

The commission shall cause to be made such inspections of any surface coal mining and reclamation operation as are necessary to ensure compliance with this chapter and any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. However, the inspections by the commission shall:

Occur on an irregular basis averaging not less than one partial inspection per month and one complete inspection per calendar quarter for the surface coal mining and reclamation operation covered by each permit.

Occur without prior notice to the permittee or the permittee’s agents or employees except for necessary onsite meetings with the permittee.

Include the filing of inspection reports adequate to enforce the requirements of and to carry out the terms and purposes of this chapter.

Occur without a warrant.

Each permittee shall conspicuously maintain at the entrances to surface coal mining and reclamation operations a clearly visible sign which sets forth the name, business address, and telephone number of the permittee and the permit number of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation.

Each inspector, upon detection of each violation of any requirement of this chapter or the regulations promulgated by the commission, shall inform the operator or permittee in writing, and shall report in writing any such violations to the commission.

Copies of any material records, reports, inspection materials, or information required under this section by the commission must be filed in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the surface coal mining operations occur.

The monitoring data collection and analysis required by this section must be conducted according to standards and procedures set forth by the commission in consultation with other appropriate state agencies in order to assure their reliability and validity.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 399, § 1; 2015, ch. 257, § 18, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 18 of chapter 257, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.